Maryland, session 2026, HB0589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0589*

HOUSE BILL 589
4–148.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(B) THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION:
(1) SHALL ACCEPT AS A REGISTERED VENDOR FOR THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM ANY PERSON THAT IS REGISTERED AS A VENDOR THROUGH THE
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY’S VENDOR REGISTRATION PROCESS; AND
(2) MAY ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH
THE COUNTY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
16–414.1.
THE BOARD OF COMMUNITY COLLEGE TRUSTEES FOR PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY:
(1) SHALL ACCEPT AS A REGISTERED VENDOR FOR PRINCE
GEORGE’S COMMUNITY COLLEGE ANY PERSON THAT IS REGISTERED AS A VENDOR
THROUGH THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY’S VENDOR REGISTRATION PROCESS;
AND
(2) MAY ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH
THE COUNTY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.